Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1156.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 441.9 of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 441.9. Verification of Eligibility.--* * *(d) The following apply regarding gambling winnings:(1) The department shall enter into a data matching agreement with the Pennsylvania Gaming Control Board to identify individuals with gambling winnings of three thousand dollars ($3,000) or more.(2) On at least a monthly basis, the department shall review the information under paragraph (1) and close the case for individuals who are ineligible for medical assistance based upon 123456789101112131415161718 verification of the winnings specified under paragraph (1).(3) An individual who has failed to disclose the winnings specified under paragraph (1) and has been identified through the database match shall be deemed to have presumptively committed an intentional violation of the medical assistance program.(e) On at least a monthly basis, the department shall receive and review information from the Department of Health concerning individuals enrolled in medical assistance that indicates a change in circumstances that may affect eligibility for medical assistance, including death records.(f) On at least a quarterly basis, the department shall receive and review information from the Department of Labor and Industry concerning individuals enrolled in medical assistance that indicates a change in circumstances that may affect eligibility for medical assistance, including changes in employment or wages.(g) On at least a monthly basis, the department shall review information concerning individuals enrolled in medical assistance that indicates a change in circumstances that may affect eligibility for medical assistance, including potential changes in residency as identified by out-of-State electronic benefit transfer (EBT) transactions.(h) On at least a monthly basis, the department shall receive and review information from the Department of Corrections concerning individuals enrolled in medical assistance that indicates a change in circumstances that may affect eligibility for medical assistance.(i) On at least a quarterly basis, the department shall receive and review information from the Department of Revenue 20250HB1156PN1283 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 concerning individuals enrolled in medical assistance that indicates a change in circumstances that may affect eligibility for food stamps, including potential changes in income, wages or residency as identified by tax records.(j) The department shall not accept eligibility determinations for medical assistance from a health insurance exchange established in this Commonwealth u nder 42 U.S.C. § 18041(c) (relating to state flexibility in operation and enforcement of Exchanges and related requirements) . The department may accept assessments from the exchange but shall verify eligibility and make eligibility determinations.(k) If the department receives information concerning an individual enrolled in medical assistance that indicates a change in circumstances that may affect eligibility for medical assistance, the department shall review the individual's case.(l) The department may execute a memorandum of understanding with any other State department, agency or division for information required to be shared between entities specified in this section.(m) Nothing in this section shall prohibit the department from contracting with one or more independent vendors to provide additional data or information that may indicate a change in circumstances that may affect eligibility for medical assistance.(n) Unless required under Federal law, the department may not:(1) Designate itself as a qualified health entity for the purpose of making presumptive eligibility determinations or for any purpose not expressly authorized by State law.(2) Accept self-attestation of income, residency, age, 20250HB1156PN1283 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 household composition, caretaker or relative status or receipt of other coverage without verification prior to enrollment.(3) Request authority to waive or decline to periodically check any available income-related data sources to verify eligibility.(4) Request authority to waive or decline to comply with public notice requirements applicable to proposed changes to the state plan in accordance with 42 CFR 440.386 (relating to public notice), 447.205 (relating to public notice of changes in statewide methods and standards for setting payment rates) and 447.57 (relating to beneficiary and public notice requirements).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1156PN1283 - 4 - 123456789101112